Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-449
Crystalline iodine; sale; requirements.

Any person who sells crystalline iodine to another person shall require photo identification of the purchaser and shall maintain a written record for a period of five years after the sale, including the date of the sale, the name, address, and date of birth of the purchaser, and the quantity purchased.

Laws 2001, LB 113, § 2.